District of Columbia statutes.
6-601.06

Frame dwellings.

No wooden or frame building erected, altered, or converted after June 1, 1910, for use as a human habitation shall exceed 3 stories or exceed 40 feet in height to the roof.

June 1, 1910, 36 Stat. 454, ch. 263, § 6
1981 Ed., § 5-406.
1973 Ed., § 5-406.